Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 62. Marine Pilots.

Cross references. —

For legislative policy, findings, and intent in connection with the amendments made to this chapter by ch. 89, SLA 1991, see § 1, ch. 89, SLA 1991 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For board of marine pilots, see 12 AAC 56.

Collateral references. —

70 Am. Jur. 2d, Shipping, §§ 234-238, 507-511.

70 C.J.S., Pilots of Vessels, § 1 et seq.